Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Resignation and Termination

§ 17-19-620.
Resignation.

A member may resign at any time.

The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligations the member may have to the corporation as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to resignation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-621.
Termination, expulsion and suspension.

No member of a public benefit or mutual benefit corporation may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships in such corporations may be terminated or suspended except pursuant to a procedure that is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

A procedure is fair and reasonable when either:

The articles or bylaws set forth a procedure that provides:

Not less than fifteen (15) days prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension or termination and the reasons therefor; and

An opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five (5) days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination by a person or persons authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination or suspension not take place; or

It is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances.

Any written notice given by mail shall be given by first class, return receipt requested, sent to the last address of the member shown on the corporation’s records.

Any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, shall be commenced within one (1) year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination.

A member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the corporation for dues, assessments or fees as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made prior to expulsion or suspension.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-622.
Purchase of memberships.

A public benefit or religious corporation may not purchase any of its memberships or any right arising therefrom.

A mutual benefit corporation may purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions set forth in or authorized by its articles or bylaws. No payment shall be made in violation of article 13 of this act.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).